Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1454.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2153(a)(7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13) and (16)(i) and (v) introductory paragraph of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and paragraph (14) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 2153. Powers and duties of commission.(a) Powers and duties.--The commission, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission, shall have the powers to:* * *(7) Establish a research and development program within the commission for the purpose of:123456789101112131415161718192021 (i) Serving as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation and dissemination of information on Commonwealth sentencing, resentencing [and], parole and bail practices.(ii) Assisting and serving in a consulting capacity to the board, State courts, departments and agencies in the development, maintenance and coordination of sound sentencing, resentencing [and], parole and bail practices.(8) Collect systematically the data obtained from studies, research and the empirical experience of public and private agencies concerning the sentencing and bail processes.(9) Publish data concerning the sentencing [and], parole and bail processes.(10) Collect systematically and disseminate information concerning parole dispositions [and], sentences actually imposed and bail and pretrial release conditions set, including initial sentences and any subsequent modification of sentences or resentences following revocation or remand, and parole and reparole decisions by the board and any other parole authority.(11) Collect systematically and disseminate information regarding effectiveness of parole dispositions [and], sentences imposed and bail and pretrial release conditions set.(12) Make recommendations to the General Assembly concerning modification or enactment of sentencing, parole [and], bail and correctional statutes which the commission finds to be necessary and advisable to carry out an 20250HB1454PN1702 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective, humane and rational sentencing, resentencing, bail and parole policy.(13) Establish a plan and timetable to collect and disseminate information relating to incapacitation, recidivism, deterrence and overall effectiveness of sentences [and], parole dispositions imposed and bail regulations and guidelines.(14) Establish a program to systematically monitor compliance with the guidelines, with the risk assessment instrument, with recommitment ranges and with mandatory sentencing laws to document eligibility for a release in accordance with a county reentry plan, to document eligibility for and imposition of recidivism risk reduction incentive minimum sentences and to document all parole and reparole decisions by the board and any other paroling authority by:* * *(i.1) Promulgating forms which document the application of bail and pretrial release conditions guidelines.* * *(16) Report to the General Assembly on:(i) implementation of revisions to the guidelines under sections 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing) [and], 2154.1 (relating to adoption of guidelines for restrictive conditions) and 2154.8 (relating to adoption of guidelines for bail and pretrial release conditions);* * *(v) evaluations of the effectiveness and cost-20250HB1454PN1702 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 benefit of various criminal justice interventions and programming, including restrictive conditions of bail, probation, recidivism risk reduction incentive programs, the State Drug Treatment Program, the State Motivational Boot Camp Program, pretrial diversion programs, prisoner treatment programs and prison reentry programs. For evaluations of the effectiveness and cost-benefit of a program in reducing recidivism, the commission shall report on:* * *Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2154.8. Adoption of guidelines for bail and pretrial release conditions.(a) Duty of commission.--The commission shall recommend to the General Assembly guidelines for the setting of bail and pretrial release conditions within the limits established by law which shall be considered by any court exercising its power to set bail and pretrial release conditions. In adopting the guidelines, the commission shall recommend bail and pretrial release conditions that are consistent with:(i) the protection of the public;(ii) the gravity of the offense charge as it relates to the victim and community; and(iii) the constitutional rights of the defendant.(b) Factors.--The guidelines shall address the following factors:(1) The seriousness of the offense charged, by specifying the range of bail and pretrial release conditions applicable to crimes of a given degree of gravity.(2) Criminal history, by specifying a range of bail and 20250HB1454PN1702 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pretrial release conditions of increased amounts or restrictions for defendants previously convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for one or more misdemeanor or felony offenses committed prior to the current offense. The commission may exclude or reduce the valuation of less serious offenses and increase the valuation of offenses committed while under supervision or in a temporal or offense pattern.(3) Criminal behavior, by specifying a range of bail and pretrial release conditions of increased amounts or restrictions for defendants who are alleged to have attempted to inflict or inflicted substantial harm or threatened to or caused a significant risk of death during the commission of the alleged offense.(4) Failure to appear, by specifying a range of bail and pretrial release conditions of increased amounts or restrictions for defendants who have previously been released on bail and have failed to appear as required or complied with the conditions of a bail bond.(5) Community-based support systems, including:(i) the presence of family with whom the accused resides;(ii) current connections to a school or employment within the court's jurisdiction; and(iii) membership or current participation in organized social groups, athletic teams or religious organizations.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1454PN1702 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Previously convicted of or adjudicated delinquent." Any finding of guilt or adjudication of delinquency, whether or not sentence has been imposed or disposition ordered, prior to the commission of the current alleged offense.Section 3. Section 2155(a)(1) introductory paragraph and (c)(1) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 2155. Publication of guidelines for sentencing, resentencing and parole, risk assessment instrument and recommitment ranges following revocation.(a) General rule.--The commission shall:(1) Prior to adoption, publish in the Pennsylvania Bulletin all proposed sentencing guidelines, resentencing guidelines following revocation of probation, guidelines for restrictive conditions of probation, parole guidelines, bail and pretrial release conditions guidelines, risk assessment instrument and recommitment ranges following revocation by the board of paroles granted, and hold public hearings not earlier than 30 days and not later than 60 days thereafter to afford an opportunity for the following persons and organizations to testify:* * *(c) Effective date.--(1) Sentencing guidelines, resentencing guidelines following revocation of probation, county intermediate punishment and State intermediate punishment, parole guidelines, bail and pretrial release conditions guidelines, risk assessment instrument and recommitment ranges following revocation by the board of paroles granted, adopted by the commission shall become effective 90 days after publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin pursuant to subsection (a)(2) 20250HB1454PN1702 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless disapproved pursuant to subsection (b) and shall apply to sentences and resentences and parole decisions made after the effective date of the guidelines.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1454PN1702 - 7 - 12345